src/test/resources/affix1.aff
# comment

SET UTF-8
TRY esijanrtolcdugmphbyfvkwqxzäüößáéêàâñESIJANRTOLCDUGMPHBYFVKWQXZÄÜÖÉ-.

PFX U Y 1
PFX U   0     un       .

SFX F Y 4
SFX F   0     nen        in
SFX F   e     in         e
SFX F   e     innen      e
SFX F   0     in         [^i]n
